New York, session 2025-2026, S6466.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 40 to read as follows: 3 (40) (A) Every policy which provides coverage for hospital, surgical 4 or medical care or provides reimbursement for laboratory tests or 5 reimbursement for diagnostic X-ray services shall provide coverage for 6 testing for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's disease and Tay-Sachs. 7 (B) Such coverage shall be included at the inception of all new poli- 8 cies and, with respect to all other policies, at any anniversary date of 9 the policy subject to evidence of insurability. 10 (C) For purposes of this paragraph, in order to maintain the confiden- 11 tiality of persons tested, receipt of an acknowledgment from the labora- 12 tory performing the test for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's disease 13 and Tay-Sachs shall be deemed sufficient evidence of the performance of 14 such testing. 15 (D) Such coverage may be subject to annual deductibles and co-insu- 16 rance as may be deemed appropriate by the superintendent and as are 17 consistent with those established for other benefits within a given 18 policy. 19 § 2. Subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 20 adding a new paragraph 23 to read as follows: 21 (23) (A) A group policy which provides coverage for hospital, surgical 22 or medical care or provides reimbursement for laboratory tests or 23 reimbursement for diagnostic X-ray services shall provide coverage for 24 testing for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's disease and Tay-Sachs. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04430-01-5 S. 6466 2 1 (B) Such coverage shall be included at the inception of all new poli- 2 cies and, with respect to all other policies, at any anniversary date of 3 the policy subject to evidence of insurability. 4 (C) For purposes of this paragraph, in order to maintain the confiden- 5 tiality of persons tested, receipt of an acknowledgment from the labora- 6 tory performing the test for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's disease 7 and Tay-Sachs shall be deemed sufficient evidence of the performance of 8 such testing. 9 (D) Such coverage may be subject to annual deductibles and co-insu- 10 rance as may be deemed appropriate by the superintendent and as are 11 consistent with those established for other benefits within a given 12 policy. 13 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 14 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 15 (ww) (1) A medical expense indemnity corporation, a hospital service 16 corporation or a health service corporation which provides coverage for 17 hospital, surgical or medical care or provides reimbursement for labora- 18 tory tests or reimbursement for diagnostic X-ray services shall provide 19 coverage for testing for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's disease and 20 Tay-Sachs. 21 (2) Such coverage shall be included at the inception of all new poli- 22 cies and, with respect to all other policies, at any anniversary date of 23 the policy subject to evidence of insurability. 24 (3) For purposes of this subsection, in order to maintain the confi- 25 dentiality of persons tested, receipt of an acknowledgment from the 26 laboratory performing the test for familial dysautonomia, Canavan's 27 disease and Tay-Sachs shall be deemed sufficient evidence of the 28 performance of such testing. 29 (4) Such coverage may be subject to annual deductibles and co-insu- 30 rance as may be deemed appropriate by the superintendent and as are 31 consistent with those established for other benefits within a given 32 policy. 33 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.